Mississippi, session 2026, SB2653.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi IT Optimization Act." (2)  As used in this chapter, all words and phrases used herein shall have the meanings as are ascribed to and provided for them in Section 25-53-3, and the following words shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless context clearly requires otherwise: (a)  "Information technology enterprise architecture" means the framework used to manage and align the business processes, information systems, data and other technology infrastructure of state government with statewide information technology strategic goals. (b)  "Information technology enterprise application portfolio" means the statewide inventory and analysis of information technology systems and applications operated by state agencies. (c)  "Information technology enterprise architecture review" means the review conducted by ITS under subsection (4)(e) of this section to determine whether proposed agency information technology investments comply with statewide information technology enterprise architecture standards. (3)  There is hereby established the Statewide Information Technology Optimization Program, which shall provide for the coordinated planning, development, implementation and oversight of enterprise information technology architecture for all state agencies for all information technology as defined under Section 25-53-3.  The program shall establish statewide information technology architecture standards, ensure alignment of agency technology plans with statewide enterprise objectives, support efficient and secure information technology investments, increase shared information technology and reduce unnecessary duplication of systems, services and recourses across state government.  For the purposes of this section, "architecture" only applies to information technology and is not intended to be defined as governed by Title 73, Mississippi Code of 1972. (4)  The Mississippi Department of Information Technology Services ("ITS"), in collaboration with all state agencies, shall provide centralized management and coordination of the statewide information technology enterprise architecture. ITS is authorized to effectuate this program, which includes the following duties and responsibilities: (a)  Serve as the sole authority for defining the statewide information technology enterprise architecture, including the enterprise business architecture, data and information architecture, application architecture, technology and infrastructure architecture, cloud architecture and security architecture; (b)  Develop, maintain and publish statewide enterprise information technology architecture standards, policies, principles and guidelines to be implemented by all state agencies to the extent that they apply; (c)  Develop and maintain a statewide enterprise information technology application portfolio, including application inventory, lifecycle status, technical dependencies, costs, security requirements and integration mappings for all systems operated by state agencies; (d)  In addition to technology plans, review and evaluate agency information, technology strategies and future plans to ensure they align with statewide enterprise information technology architecture standards and statewide strategic technology goals and objectives; (e)  Conduct an Information Technology Enterprise Architecture Review in accordance with ITS published policies, rules or regulations of proposed agency information technology acquisitions, projects, systems or services prior to procurement or implementation to ensure compliance with statewide standards, avoid duplication, promote interoperability and ensure alignment with the Strategic Master Plan for Information Technology; (f)  Identify and recommend to the ITS Board opportunities for enterprise information technology services, system consolidation, shared platform adoption, cloud modernization and reduction of redundant or obsolete systems; (g)  Collaborate with the Office of the Chief Information Security Officer to ensure that all information technology enterprise architecture standards incorporate statewide cybersecurity requirements; (h)  Ensure, as applicable, that information technology enterprise architecture requirements and standards are incorporated as minimum requirements in all solicitations for the procurement of data, information technology systems, software, telecommunications, cloud services and related services; (i)  Provide guidance and technical assistance to agencies for planning and implementing technology solutions that comply with enterprise architecture requirements, as appropriate; (j)  Prepare and submit periodic reports on information technology enterprise architecture compliance, statewide technology alignment, and modernization opportunities to the ITS Board, CIO Council and the chairpersons of the Technology Committees of the Mississippi State Senate and House of Representatives; and (k)  Promulgate policies, rules and regulations necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section. (5)  Each state agency's executive director or agency head shall: (a)  Align, as applicable, the agency's technology plans, investments and systems with the statewide information technology enterprise architecture standards established by ITS; (b)  Participate, to the fullest extent feasible, in the statewide Technology Optimization Program and utilize enterprise services and shared platforms in lieu of standalone or duplicative systems specific to the agency; (c)  Submit all proposed information technology projects, acquisitions or system changes to ITS for review prior to any solicitation, procurement, contract amendment or implementation, as determined by ITS; (d)  Provide timely, complete and accurate information for inclusion in the statewide information technology enterprise application portfolio; (e)  Develop or adopt, implement and maintain internal agency information technology architecture guidelines that support the statewide enterprise architecture standards; and (f)  Ensure that all solicitations, contracts, amendments and technology initiatives undertaken by the agency incorporate and comply with statewide information technology enterprise architecture requirements. (6)  The Technology Optimization Program shall be managed by ITS and externally supported by the Chief Information Officer ("CIO") Council established in Section 25-53-281. The CIO Council shall provide guidance on statewide enterprise architecture standards, identify shared opportunities, support interagency collaboration and provide recommendations on information technology enterprise architecture compliance and exceptions.  The ITS Board shall provide statutory oversight of statewide information technology policies, standards, planning and procurements. (7)  Records and documentation generated or meetings that occur pursuant to this section that contain sensitive information related to security, infrastructure or statewide information technology architecture shall be exempt from the requirements of the Mississippi Public Records Act and the Open Meetings Act. (8)  The provisions of this section shall be implemented in a phased manner according to timelines established by ITS.  All state agencies must comply with the requirements of this section. (9)  Any information technology acquisition made on behalf of or by ITS for purposes of shared use, the following entities may utilize such acquisitions or contracts in accordance with ITS rules and procedures: (a)  State agencies; (b)  Public and private institutions of higher learning; (c)  Local political subdivisions of the state, including governing authorities; and (d)  Community and junior colleges. (10)  ITS is authorized to receive donations, grants and other funding from any public or private source that may be available to support its mission.  Any funds donated or received for this purpose shall be deposited in the Technology Innovation Fund. (11)  ITS is authorized to develop and implement an internship, fellowship or other related programs for the purposes of strengthening a network of professionals committed to the mission of ITS as provided in Section 25-53-1 et seq., and by fostering innovation and supporting research and practice in the field of information technology in Mississippi state government. (12)  All funds designated by agencies for procurement of information technology provided by ITS to its customers for shared use shall be paid into the ITS Revolving Fund, which monies shall be used by ITS for payment to vendors for hardware, software or services acquired.  Payments due from such agency shall be paid, transferred or allocated into the ITS Revolving Fund pursuant to a schedule established by ITS.  In the event such sums are not paid by the defined payment period, the Executive Director of the Department of Finance and Administration shall issue a requisition for a warrant to draw such amount as may be due from any funds appropriated for the use of the agency which has failed to make the payment as agreed. (13)  ITS is hereby authorized to exercise all powers necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section. SECTION 2.  Section 1 of this act shall be codified in Chapter 53, Title 25, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.